Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1201
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 57-1201 to 57-1214, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Person shall mean any natural person, firm, concern, receiver, trustee, executor, administrator, agent, institution, association, partnership, limited liability company, company, corporation, or person acting under a declaration of trust;

(2) Sever shall mean to take from the land by any means whatsoever; and

(3) Uranium shall mean tri-uranium oct-oxide.

Laws 1983, LB 356, § 13;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 354.